Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.196 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A public school or public charter school shall provide instruction and instructional
materials that are aligned with the social studies academic standards adopted in
accordance with KRS 158.6453 and consistent with the following concepts:
(a) All individuals are created equal;
(b) Americans are entitled to equal protection under the law;
(c) An individual deserves to be treated on the basis of the individual's character;
(d) An individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, does not bear
responsibility for actions committed by other members of the same race or
sex;
(e) The understanding that the institution of slavery and post-Civil War laws
enforcing racial segregation and discrimination were contrary to the
fundamental American promise of life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness,
as expressed in the Declaration of Independence, but that defining racial
disparities solely on the legacy of this institution is destructive to the
unification of our nation;
(f) The roles and contributions of people indigenous to the Americas, people of
color, and people from other marginalized or non-European groups, as well
as lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender people, in the history of this
country and the Commonwealth;
(g) The future of America's success is dependent upon cooperation among all its
citizens;
(h)[(g)] Personal agency and the understanding that, regardless of one's
circumstances, an American has the ability to succeed when he or she is given
sufficient opportunity and is committed to seizing that opportunity through
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 9:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 104
hard work, pursuit of education, and good citizenship; and
(i)[(h)] The significant value of the American principles of equality, freedom,
inalienable rights, respect for individual rights, liberty, and the consent of the
governed.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to restrict a public
school or public charter school from providing instruction or using instructional
materials that include:
(a) The history of an ethnic group, as described in textbooks and instructional
materials adopted by a school district;
(b) The discussion of controversial aspects of history; or
(c) The instruction and instructional materials on the historical oppression of a
particular group of people.
(3) (a) Notwithstanding the every six (6) year schedule set forth in KRS
158.6453(2)(a), no later than July 1, 2023, the Kentucky Department of
Education shall incorporate fundamental American documents and speeches
into the grade-level appropriate middle and high school social studies
academic standards and align corresponding assessments, including but not
limited to:
1. The Mayflower Compact;
2. The Declaration of Independence;
3. The Constitution of the United States;
4. The Federalist No. 1 (Alexander Hamilton);
5. The Federalist Nos. 10 and 51 (James Madison);
6. The June 8, 1789, speech on amendments to the Constitution of the
United States by James Madison;
7. The first ten (10) amendments to the Constitution of the United States,
also known as the Bill of Rights;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 9:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 104
8. The 1796 Farewell Address by George Washington;
9. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Marbury v. Madison, 5
U.S. 137 (1803);
10. The Monroe Doctrine by James Monroe;
11. What to the Slave is the Fourth of July? speech by Frederick Douglass;
12. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Dred Scott v. Sandford, 60
U.S. 393 (1857);
13. Final Emancipation Proclamation by Abraham Lincoln;
14. The Gettysburg Address by Abraham Lincoln;
15. Declaration of Rights of the Women of the United States by Susan B.
Anthony, Matilda Joslyn Gage, and Elizabeth Cady Stanton;
16. The September 18, 1895, Atlanta Exposition Address by Booker T.
Washington;
17. Of Booker T. Washington and Others by W.E.B. Du Bois;
18. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Plessy v. Ferguson, 163
U.S. 537 (1896);
19. The August 31, 1910, New Nationalism speech by Theodore Roosevelt;
20. The January 11, 1944, State of the Union Address by Franklin D.
Roosevelt;
21. The United States Supreme Court opinions in Brown v. Board of
Education of Topeka, 347 U.S. 483 (1954) and Brown v. Board of
Education of Topeka, 349 U.S. 294 (1955);
22. Letter from Birmingham Jail by Martin Luther King, Jr.;
23. The August 28, 1963, I Have a Dream speech by Martin Luther King,
Jr.; and
24. A Time for Choosing by Ronald Reagan.
(b) This revision shall not delay or otherwise impact the existing schedule as set
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 9:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 104
forth in KRS 158.6453(2).
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 9:54 AM Jacketed